Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 80.
[REVISION OF THE JUDICIAL ARTICLE] (MULTIPLE PROVISIONS OF CONST., ART. 7 REPEALED; CONST. AMENDS. 58, 64, AND 77, §
1, REPEALED; AND SECTIONS ADDED).

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 914, § 1, codified as § 16-10-136, provided: “Qualifications of justices and judges. Restrictions on extrajudicial activities found in Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 80, shall not preclude a justice or judge from: (1) Being a member of the reserve units of any branch of the United States Armed Forces; (2) Being a member of the National Guard; (3) Teaching; (4) Serving on any state or United States boards or commissions which relate to the law for the administration of justice; or (5) Serving in an extrajudicial capacity which is not prohibited by the Arkansas Code of Judicial Conduct.”

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by S.J.R. 9 during the 1999 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2000 general election by a vote of 431,137 for and 323,647 against.

This amendment was designated as Amendment 80 by the Secretary of State, and was known as Amendment No. 3 on the general election ballot for 2000: “An amendment to revise the judicial article of the Arkansas Constitution.” The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.

§ 1. Judicial power.

The judicial power is vested in the Judicial Department of state government, consisting of a Supreme Court and other courts established by this Constitution.

§ 2. Supreme Court.

Statewide appellate jurisdiction;

Original jurisdiction to issue writs of quo warranto to all persons holding judicial office, and to officers of political corporations when the question involved is the legal existence of such corporations;

Original jurisdiction to answer questions of state law certified by a court of the United States, which may be exercised pursuant to Supreme Court rule;

Original jurisdiction to determine sufficiency of state initiative and referendum petitions and proposed constitutional amendments; and

Only such other original jurisdiction as provided by this Constitution.

Circuit Courts are established as the trial courts of original jurisdiction of all justiciable matters not otherwise assigned pursuant to this Constitution.

Subject to the superintending control of the Supreme Court, the Judges of a Circuit Court may divide that Circuit Court into subject matter divisions, and any Circuit Judge within the Circuit may sit in any division.

Circuit Judges may temporarily exchange circuits by joint order. Any Circuit Judge who consents may be assigned to another circuit for temporary service under rules adopted by the Supreme Court.

The Circuit Courts shall hold their sessions in each county at such times and places as are, or may be, prescribed by law.

District Courts are established as the trial courts of limited jurisdiction as to amount and subject matter, subject to the right of appeal to Circuit Courts for a trial de novo.

The jurisdictional amount and the subject matter of civil cases that may be heard in the District Courts shall be established by Supreme Court rule. District Courts shall have original jurisdiction, concurrent with Circuit Courts, of misdemeanors, and shall also have such other criminal jurisdiction as may be provided pursuant to Section 10 of this Amendment.

There shall be at least one District Court in each county. If there is only one District Court in a county, it shall have county-wide jurisdiction. Fines and penalties received by the district court shall continue to be distributed in the manner provided by current law, unless and until the General Assembly shall establish a new method of distribution.

A District Judge may serve in one or more counties. Subject to the superintending control of the Supreme Court, the Judges of a District Court may divide that District Court into subject matter divisions, and any District Judge within the district may sit in any division.

District Judges may temporarily exchange districts by joint order. Any District Judge who consents may be assigned to another district for temporary service under rules adopted by the Supreme Court.

A Circuit Court Judge may appoint referees or masters, who shall have power to perform such duties of the Circuit Court as may be prescribed by Supreme Court rule.

With the concurrence of a majority of the Circuit Court Judges of the Circuit, a District Court judge may appoint magistrates, who shall be subject to the superintending control of the District Court and shall have power to perform such duties of the District Court as may be prescribed by Supreme Court rule.

If a Supreme Court Justice is disqualified or temporarily unable to serve, the Chief Justice shall certify the fact to the Governor, who within thirty (30) days thereafter shall commission a Special Justice, unless the time is extended by the Chief Justice upon a showing by the Governor that, in spite of the exercise of diligence, additional time is needed. If the Governor fails to commission a Special Justice within thirty (30) days, or within any extended period granted by the Chief Justice, the Lieutenant Governor shall commission a Special Justice.

If a Judge of the Court of Appeals is disqualified or temporarily unable to serve, the Chief Judge shall certify the fact to the Chief Justice who shall commission a Special Judge.

If a Circuit or District Judge is disqualified or temporarily unable to serve, or if the Chief Justice shall determine there is other need for a Special Judge to be temporarily appointed, a Special Judge may be assigned by the Chief Justice or elected by the bar of that Court, under rules prescribed by the Supreme Court, to serve during the period of temporary disqualification, absence or need.

In naming Special Justices and Judges, the Governor or the Chief Justice may commission, with their consent, retired Justices or Judges, active Circuit or District Judges, or licensed attorneys.

Special and retired Justices and Judges selected and assigned for temporary judicial service shall meet the qualifications of Justices or Judges of the Court to which selected and assigned.

Special and retired judges shall be compensated as provided by law.

Justices of the Supreme Court and Judges of the Court of Appeals shall have been licensed attorneys of this state for at least eight years immediately preceding the date of assuming office. They shall serve eight-year terms.

Circuit Judges shall have been licensed attorneys of this state for at least six years immediately preceding the date of assuming office. They shall serve six-year terms.

District Judges shall have been licensed attorneys of this state for at least four years immediately preceding the date of assuming office. They shall serve four-year terms.

All Justices and Judges shall be qualified electors within the geographical area from which they are chosen, and Circuit and District Judges shall reside within that geographical area at the time of election and during their period of service. A geographical area may include any county contiguous to the county to be served when there are no qualified candidates available in the county to be served.

The General Assembly shall by law determine the amount and method of payment of expenses of Justices and Judges. Such expenses may be increased, but not diminished, during the term for which such Justices or Judges are selected or elected.

Circuit, District, and Appellate Court Judges and Justices shall not be allowed any fees or perquisites of office, nor hold any other office of trust or profit under this state or the United States, except as authorized by law. [As amended by Const. Amend. 94.]

Circuit Judges and District Judges shall be elected on a nonpartisan basis by a majority of qualified electors voting for such office within the circuit or district which they serve.

Vacancies in these offices shall be filled as provided by this Constitution.

Supreme Court Justices and Court of Appeals Judges shall be elected on a nonpartisan basis by a majority of qualified electors voting for such office. Provided, however, the General Assembly may refer the issue of merit selection of members of the Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals to a vote of the people at any general election. If the voters approve a merit selection system, the General Assembly shall enact laws to create a judicial nominating commission for the purpose of nominating candidates for merit selection to the Supreme Court and Court of Appeals.

Vacancies in these offices shall be filled by appointment of the Governor, unless the voters provide otherwise in a system of merit selection.

Tenure of Present Justices and Judges.

(E)

The Supreme Court shall have power to issue and determine any and all writs necessary in aid of its jurisdiction and to delegate to its several justices the power to issue such writs.

(F)

The Supreme Court shall appoint its clerk and reporter.

(G)

The sessions of the Supreme Court shall be held at such times and places as may be adopted by Supreme Court rule.

§ 3. Rules of pleading, practice, and procedure.

The Supreme Court shall prescribe the rules of pleading, practice and procedure for all courts; provided these rules shall not abridge, enlarge or modify any substantive right and shall preserve the right of trial by jury as declared in this Constitution.

§ 4. Superintending control.

The Supreme Court shall exercise general superintending control over all courts of the state and may temporarily assign judges, with their consent, to courts or divisions other than that for which they were elected or appointed. These functions shall be administered by the Chief Justice.

§ 5. Court of Appeals.

There shall be a Court of Appeals which may have divisions thereof as established by Supreme Court rule. The Court of Appeals shall have such appellate jurisdiction as the Supreme Court shall by rule determine and shall be subject to the general superintending control of the Supreme Court. Judges of the Court of Appeals shall have the same qualifications as Justices of the Supreme Court.

§ 6. Circuit courts.

§ 7. District courts.

§ 8. Referees, masters and magistrates.

Any rules promulgated by the Supreme Court pursuant to Sections 5, 6(B), 7(B), 7(D), or 8 of this Amendment may be annulled or amended, in whole or in part, by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the membership of each house of the General Assembly.

§ 10. Jurisdiction, venue, circuits, districts and number of judges.

The General Assembly shall have the power to establish jurisdiction of all courts and venue of all actions therein, unless otherwise provided in this Constitution, and the power to establish judicial circuits and districts and the number of judges for Circuit Courts and District Courts, provided such circuits or districts are comprised of contiguous territories.

§ 11. Right of appeal.

There shall be a right of appeal to an appellate court from the Circuit Courts and other rights of appeal as may be provided by Supreme Court rule or by law.

§ 12. Temporary disqualification of justices or judges.

No Justice or Judge shall preside or participate in any case in which he or she might be interested in the outcome, in which any party is related to him or her by consanguinity or affinity within such degree as prescribed by law, or in which he or she may have been counsel or have presided in any inferior court.

Cross References.

Disqualification from proceedings for lack of impartiality, Ark. Code Jud. Cond. 2.11.

§ 13. Assignment of special and retired judges.

§ 14. Prohibition of practice of law.

Justices and Judges, except District Judges, shall not practice law during their respective terms of office. The General Assembly may, by classification, prohibit District Judges from practicing law.

§ 15. Prohibition of candidacy for non-judicial office.

If a Judge or Justice files as a candidate for non-judicial governmental office, that candidate's judicial office shall immediately become vacant.

§ 16. Qualifications and terms of justices and judges.

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 94, which amended this section effective November 5, 2014, was proposed by H.J.R. 1009 during the 2013 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2014 general election by a vote of 428,206 for and 388,459 against.

Before amendment, subsection (E) read: “The General Assembly shall by law determine the amount and method of payment of Justices and Judges. Such salaries and expenses may be increased, but not diminished, during the term for which such Justices or Judges are selected or elected. Salaries of Circuit Judges shall be uniform throughout the state.”

§ 17. Election of circuit and district judges.

§ 19. Transition provisions, tenure of present justices and judges, and jurisdiction of present courts.

Justices of the Supreme Court and Judges of the Court of Appeals in office at the time this amendment takes effect shall continue in office until the end of the terms for which they were elected or appointed.

All Circuit, Chancery, and Circuit-Chancery Judges in office at the time this Amendment takes effect shall continue in office as Circuit Judges until the end of the terms for which they were elected or appointed; provided further, the respective jurisdictional responsibilities for matters legal, equitable or juvenile in nature as presently exercised by such Judges shall continue until changed pursuant to law.

Municipal Court Judges in office at the time this Amendment takes effect shall continue in office through December 31, 2004; provided, if a vacancy occurs in an office of a Municipal Judge, that vacancy shall be filled for a term which shall end December 31, 2004.

The following sections of Article 7 of the Constitution of the State of Arkansas are hereby repealed effective July 1, 2001; 1 through 18; 20 through 22; 24; 25; 32; 34; 35; 39; 40; 42; 44; 45 and 50.

Sections 34 and 35 of Article 7 of the Constitution of the State of Arkansas, as amended by Sections 1 and 2 of Amendment 24, are hereby repealed effective July 1, 2001.

Section 43 of Article 7 of the Constitution of the State of Arkansas is hereby repealed effective January 1, 2005.

Section 1 of Amendment 58 of the Constitution of the State of Arkansas is hereby repealed effective July 1, 2001.

Section 1 of Amendment 64 of the Constitution of the State of Arkansas is hereby repealed effective January 1, 2005.

Section 1 of Amendment 77 of the Constitution of the State of Arkansas is hereby repealed effective July 1, 2001.

No other provision of the Constitution of the State of Arkansas shall be repealed by this Amendment unless the provision is in irreconcilable conflict with the provisions of this Amendment.

(B)

Jurisdiction of Present Courts.

(1)

The Jurisdiction conferred on Circuit Courts established by this Amendment includes all matters previously cognizable by Circuit, Chancery, Probate and Juvenile Courts including those matters repealed by Section 22 of this Amendment. The geographic circuits and subject matter divisions of these courts existing at the time this Amendment takes effect shall become circuits and divisions of the Circuit Court as herein established until changed pursuant to this Amendment. Circuit Courts shall assume the jurisdiction of Circuit, Chancery, Probate and Juvenile Courts.

(2)

District Courts shall have the jurisdiction vested in Municipal Courts, Corporation Courts, Police Courts, Justice of the Peace Courts, and Courts of Common Pleas at the time this Amendment takes effect. District Courts shall assume the jurisdiction of these courts of limited jurisdiction and other jurisdiction conferred in this Amendment on January 1, 2005. City Courts shall continue in existence after the effective date of this Amendment unless such City Court is abolished by the governing body of the city or by appropriate action of the General Assembly. Immediately upon abolition of such City Court, the jurisdiction of the City Court shall vest in the nearest District Court in the county where the city is located.

(C)

Continuation of Courts. The Supreme Court provided for in this Amendment shall be a continuation of the Supreme Court now existing. The Court of Appeals shall be regarded as a continuation of the Court of Appeals now existing. All laws and parts of laws relating to the Supreme Court and to the Court of Appeals which are not in conflict or inconsistent with this Amendment shall remain in full force and effect and shall apply to the Supreme Court and Court of Appeals, respectively, established by this Amendment until amended, repealed or superseded by appropriate action of the General Assembly or the Supreme Court pursuant to this Amendment. The Circuit Courts shall be regarded as a continuation of the Circuit, Chancery, Probate and Juvenile Courts now existing. Effective January 1, 2005, the District Courts shall be regarded as a continuation of the Municipal Courts, Corporation Courts, Police Courts, Justice of the Peace Courts and Courts of Common Pleas now existing. All the papers and records pertaining to these courts shall be transferred accordingly, and no suit or prosecution of any kind or nature shall abate because of any change made by this Amendment. All writs, actions, suits, proceedings, civil or criminal liabilities, prosecutions, judgments, decrees, orders, sentences, regulations, causes of action and appeals existing on the effective date of this Amendment shall continue unaffected except as modified in accordance with this Amendment.

Cross References.

Jurisdiction of circuit courts, § 9-27-306.

§ 20. Prosecuting attorneys.

A Prosecuting Attorney shall be elected by the qualified electors of each judicial circuit. Prosecuting Attorneys shall have been licensed attorneys of this state for at least four years immediately preceding the date of assuming office. They shall be qualified electors within the judicial circuit from which they are elected and shall reside within that geographical area at the time of the election and during their period of service. They shall serve four-year terms.

§ 21. Effective date.

This Amendment shall become effective on July, 2001.

Publisher's Notes.

The text of this section has been printed exactly as enacted. Based on the effective dates of the repeals in Ark. Const. Amend. 80, § 22, the apparent intent was to make this Amendment effective July 1, 2001.

§ 22. Repealer.

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by H.J.R. 1004 during the 2001 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2002 general election by a vote of 407,111 for and 308,261 against.

Subsection (b) of Ark. Const. Amend. 81, provided: “Section 3 of Amendment 50 of the Arkansas Constitution is hereby repealed.”

The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.

§ 9. Annulment or amendment of rules.

§ 18. Election of Supreme Court Justices and Court of Appeals Judges.